Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2486YC (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. 2022 Iowa Acts, chapter 1002, section 53, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 SEC. 53. PRESERVATION OF EXISTING RIGHTS. 3 1. This Except as provided in subsection 2, this division 4 of this Act is not intended to and shall not limit, modify, or 5 otherwise adversely affect any amount of tax credit issued, 6 awarded, or allowed prior to January 1, 2023, nor shall it 7 limit, modify, or otherwise adversely affect a taxpayerâs right 8 to claim or redeem a tax credit issued, awarded, or allowed 9 prior to January 1, 2023, including but not limited to any tax 10 credit carryforward amount. 11 2. The section of this division of this Act amending the 12 historic preservation tax credit is not intended to and shall 13 not limit, modify, or otherwise adversely affect any amount of 14 the tax credit issued, awarded, or allowed prior to July 1, 15 2023, nor shall it limit, modify, or otherwise adversely affect 16 a taxpayerâs right to claim or redeem the tax credit issued, 17 awarded, or allowed prior to July 1, 2023, including but not 18 limited to any tax credit carryforward amount. 19